Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1411
Obligation of good faith.

Every duty under the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act and every act which must be performed as a condition precedent to the exercise of a right or remedy under the act imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 9.